Florida, session 2026, HB195.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
20
21 Section 1. Section 17.675, Florida Statutes, is created to
22 read:
23 17.675 Task Force on Payment Scams.—
24 (1) The Task Force on Payment Scams, a task force as
25 defined in s. 20.03(5), is created adjunct to the Department of
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb195-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 195 2026
26 Financial Services. Except as otherwise provided in this
27 section, the task force shall operate in a manner consistent
28 with s. 20.052. The department shall provide administrative and
29 staff support relating to the functions of the task force.
30 (2) As used in this section, the term:
31 (a) "Payment" means any mechanism through which an
32 individual can electronically transfer funds to another
33 individual via a platform or intermediary.
34 (b) "Task force" means the Task Force on Payment Scams
35 created under this section.
36 (3) No later than October 1, 2026, the Chief Financial
37 Officer shall establish the Task Force on Payment Scams. The
38 purpose of the task force is to recognize and avert payment
39 scams by doing all of the following:
40 (a) Examining current trends and developments in payment
41 scams, identifying effective methods for preventing such scams,
42 and issuing recommendations to enhance efforts to identify and
43 prevent such activities.
44 (b) Adopting a cross-sector approach to ensure its
45 recommendations reflect the full scope of the issue, given that
46 scams impact individuals across a wide range of industries,
47 including financial services, telecommunications, and
48 technology.
49 (c) Including representation from stakeholders with direct
50 experience supporting victims of scams, as well as industry
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb195-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 195 2026
51 participants with insight into scam tactics and prevention
52 strategies.
53 (4)(a) The task force shall be chaired by the Chief
54 Financial Officer or his or her designee and shall consist of
55 representatives from the following:
56 1. The Commissioner of Agriculture.
57 2. The Attorney General.
58 3. The Division of Treasury of the Department of Financial
59 Services.
60 4. The Department of Commerce.
61 5. The Financial Crime Analysis Center of the Department
62 of Law Enforcement.
63 6. The Financial Transaction Database of the Department of
64 Law Enforcement.
65 7. A representative, appointed by the Chief Financial
66 Officer in consultation with the task force, from a financial
67 institution with expertise in identifying, preventing, and
68 combating payment scams.
69 8. A representative, appointed by the Chief Financial
70 Officer in consultation with the task force, from a credit union
71 with expertise in identifying, preventing, and combating payment
72 scams.
73 9. A representative, appointed by the Chief Financial
74 Officer in consultation with the task force, from a digital
75 payment network with expertise in identifying, preventing, and
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb195-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 195 2026
76 combating payment scams.
77 10. A representative, appointed by the Chief Financial
78 Officer in consultation with the task force, from a community
79 bank.
80 11. A representative, appointed by the Chief Financial
81 Officer in consultation with the task force, from a consumer
82 group.
83 12. A representative, appointed by the Chief Financial
84 Officer in consultation with the task force, from an industry
85 association representing technology or online platforms.
86 13. Not more than five representatives appointed by the
87 Chief Financial Officer to represent victims, scam support
88 networks, and other relevant stakeholders in order to better
89 assist consumers and stakeholders.
90 (b) Members of the task force shall serve until the
91 termination of the task force. Any vacancy occurring in the
92 membership of the task force shall be filled in the same manner
93 in which the original appointment was made.
94 (c) Members of the task force:
95 1. Shall serve without compensation, except that employees
96 of this state shall receive the same salaries and benefits as
97 they would without serving on the task force.
98 2. Are entitled to receive reimbursement for per diem and
99 travel expenses pursuant to s. 112.061.
100 (d) The task force shall meet at least three times during
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb195-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 195 2026
101 the 1-year period beginning on October 1, 2026, and thereafter
102 at such times and places, and by such means, as the chair of the
103 task force determines to be appropriate, which may include the
104 use of remote conference technology.
105 (5) The duties of the task force include all of the
106 following:
107 (a) Evaluating best practices for combating methods used
108 by scammers, including spoofed calls, scam text messages, and
109 malicious advertisements, pop-ups, and websites.
110 (b) Assessing how other state, federal, and international
111 jurisdictions have tried to prevent payment scams.
112 (c) Identifying and reviewing current methods used to scam
113 a consumer through payment platforms.
114 (d) Determining a strategy for education programs that
115 better equip consumers to identify, avoid, and report payment
116 scam attempts to the appropriate authorities.
117 (e) Coordinating efforts to ensure perpetrators of payment
118 scams can be identified and pursued by law enforcement.
119 (f) Consulting with other relevant stakeholders, including
120 federal, state, local, and tribal agencies and financial
121 services providers.
122 (g) Determining whether any additional legislation would
123 be beneficial for law enforcement and industry in mitigating
124 payment scams.
125 (h) Identifying potential solutions to payment scams
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb195-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 195 2026
126 involving business e-mail compromise.
127 (6)(a) No later than 1 year after the date on which the
128 Chief of Financial Officer establishes the task force, the task
129 force shall submit to the President of the Senate and the
130 Speaker of the House of Representatives and make publicly
131 available online a report detailing all of the following:
132 1. The results of the reviews and evaluations of the task
133 force under subsection (5).
134 2. The strategy identified under subsection (5).
135 3. Any legislative or regulatory recommendations that
136 would enhance the ability to detect and prevent payment scams
137 described in subsection (5).
138 4. Recommendations to enhance cooperation among federal,
139 state, local, and tribal authorities in the investigation and
140 prosecution of scams and other financial crimes, including
141 harmonizing data collection, improving reporting mechanisms and
142 streams, estimating the number of complaints and consumers
143 affected, and evaluating the effectiveness of anti-scam training
144 programs.
145 (b) After submitting an initial report required under
146 paragraph (a), the task force shall submit every year to the
147 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
148 Representatives and make publicly available online an updated
149 version of the report.
150 (7) In accordance with s. 20.052(8), this section is
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb195-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 195 2026
151 repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
152 through reenactment by the Legislature.
153 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb195-00